Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
MONEY PURCHASE COMPONENT

31-31.5-501. Vesting.

A member is one hundred percent vested in the individual account in the money purchase benefit account pursuant to section 31-31.5-503.

Employer contributions made to the statewide retirement plan that are credited to the money purchase component account are subject to the following vesting rules:

In the event of permanent occupational or total disability retirement or an award of a survivor benefit due to a death of an active member pursuant to part 8 of article 31 of this title 31, a member shall be one hundred percent vested in the employer contributions made to the money purchase component account.

A member shall be one hundred percent vested in the employer's contributions made to the money purchase component account upon attaining normal retirement age if employed by the employer on or after that date.

Except as provided in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section, a member is vested in the employer contributions made to the money purchase component account in the amount of twenty percent for each full year of service performed for a covered department. Upon attaining five full years of service, a member is one hundred percent vested. Vesting also applies to employer contributions allocated pursuant to subsection 31-31.5-301 (3) or allocated under the predecessor statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to section 31-31-405.

Upon distribution, the portion of the member's employer contributions to the money purchase component account that is not vested shall be treated as a forfeiture.

Years of service in the money purchase component for purposes of this section cannot be purchased by the member or the employer.

A member who only participates in the money purchase component does not receive service credit for purposes of the lifetime benefit components.

For members who participate in both the lifetime benefit components and the money purchase component concurrently, years of service include all years of service with the employer while in the plan or a predecessor plan, regardless of whether contributions were made to the money purchase component for each year.

A member who is restored to active service after a disability ceases to exist receives credit for years of service in the money purchase component with the employer prior to the disability as well as time while out on disability.

Subject to rules adopted by the board, years of service of a member who is employed by successive employers may be aggregated for determining eligibility and benefits provided by the money purchase component of the statewide retirement plan if the service for each employer was rendered while the employer covered its members under the statewide retirement plan, the predecessor statewide defined benefit plan, or the predecessor statewide hybrid plan.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 295, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-502. Normal retirement age.

The normal retirement age for the money purchase component is age fifty-five.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 296, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-503. Individual accounts - investment and account administration.

The board shall create and maintain adequate records to disclose the interest of each member and beneficiary with assets in the money purchase component of the plan. The records must be in the form of individual accounts, and credits and charges must be made to such accounts in the manner prescribed by the board through rulemaking.

The board shall designate a record keeper responsible for the administration of the individual accounts. The maintenance of individual accounts is only for accounting purposes, and a segregation of the assets of the trust fund to each account is not required.

Distribution and withdrawals made from an account must be charged to the accounts as of the date payment is made. Earnings or losses on the amount allocated to the member's individual account while invested as part of the members self-directed investment fund must be allocated as determined by the record keeper.

The board may create and offer to each member with an individual account in the money purchase component various investment options, including at least three alternatives that allow a member a broad range of investments, diversification, and a meaningful choice between risk and return in the investment of the member's account.

One hundred percent of each individual account may be invested as directed by the member in any one or a combination of the investment options. If a member or designated beneficiary does not have a valid investment election on file for any portion of the amount in that member's accounts, that portion of the member's accounts shall be invested in the investment option selected by the board as the default option. In such event, the member or designated beneficiary is deemed to have directed that investment option for investment of that portion of the member's accounts.

Upon the death of the member, the designated beneficiary may elect to allocate the investment of the member's individual account as provided for in this section. If no notice of reallocation is received from the designated beneficiary, the member's individual account remains invested as previously allocated during the member's lifetime.

The board may establish one or more default options based upon various factors, including but not limited to market risk, stability, and rate of return. If the board has properly exercised its fiduciary duty in selecting a default option, it has no liability for any loss sustained by a member or designated beneficiary whose accounts in whole or in part are invested in the default option.

Members may redirect the investment of their account at any time and may reallocate money in existing funds as allowed by the association. The board may also bring a suit or take such other action as it deems appropriate if questions involving investment directions arise.

The accounts of members, designated beneficiaries, and alternate payees shall be adjusted in accordance with the following:

The balance of each account must be adjusted daily to reflect any distribution and all interest, dividends, account charges, and changes of market value resulting from the investment of the member's individual account.

Contributions must be allocated to the individual account of each eligible member not less frequently than monthly, according to the amount that is actually contributed on behalf of each member. In all cases, deposits of contributions shall be treated as actually made only as of the date the contributions are accepted as in good order by the record keeper.

The expenses of the money purchase component of the plan must first be paid from forfeitures, penalties received, settlement proceeds, and other sources of revenue received, and then must be allocated to and deducted from the members' accounts. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any revenue credits derived from the investments offered by the money purchase component may instead be distributed to participants. Expenses that are incurred as a direct result of the investments held in the money purchase component account must be deducted from the interest, dividends, and net income of the appropriate investment. General expenses must be deducted from the accounts of each member according to the member's time-weighted pro-rata share of the money purchase component account. The board may also assess a record keeping fee and an administrative fee for costs associated with the administration of the money purchase component.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 296, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-504. Distribution of money purchase component accounts.

A member's vested account balance becomes eligible for distribution upon the member's death, permanent occupational or total disability pursuant to part 8 of article 31 of this title 31, normal, vested, or early retirement, or termination of employment.

Upon becoming eligible for distribution and upon approval of the board, a member, or the designated beneficiary if the member dies before distribution of the member's individual account, may elect to receive the vested portion of balance of the member's individual account by one of the following methods:

The member or designated beneficiary may choose a lump sum payment of all or a portion of the member's individual account.

The member or designated beneficiary may elect to have the value of all or a portion of the individual account used to purchase an annuity contract, with a term and in a form as the member elects. If there is an elected distribution in the form of an annuity, any benefit payable as a result of the member's or beneficiary's death must be determined solely under the terms of the annuity contract.

The member may elect to have all or a portion of the member's individual account distributed in substantially equal monthly payments over the member's life expectancy or a period not to exceed the joint life expectancy of the member and a spouse, if the spouse is the sole beneficiary, or until the account is exhausted. If the member dies prior to the member's required beginning date, the designated beneficiary may elect to have all or a portion of the member's individual account distributed in substantially equal monthly payments over a period not to exceed the life expectancy of the designated beneficiary.

A member who is vested in both member and employer contributions to the money purchase component of the plan and has attained age fifty-five may elect to transfer all or part of the member's individual account balance within the plan from the money purchase component account to the lifetime benefits account to purchase a monthly benefit, which is considered a portion of the pension under part 4 of this article 31.5. At retirement, a member may make a one-time irrevocable election to purchase the monthly benefit in a single lump sum, which must be transferred prior to the receipt of benefits from the lifetime benefit components. Funds may not be transferred from outside the statewide retirement plan to purchase a monthly benefit. Any transferred or rollover funds, except those funds transferred by a department as part of an affiliation or reentry process, held within the member's individual account are not eligible for purchase of a monthly benefit and remain in the account until otherwise distributed.

A member who terminates employment and has taken a refund of the member's contributions to the lifetime benefit components is not required to withdraw the money purchase component account, which shall be maintained and shall continue to receive allocations for earnings and expenses until the assets of the account are distributed.

The board may establish by rule a minimum value for an individual account and may require distribution if an account falls below the required minimum value without receipt of a request for distribution.

Upon a member's death with no designated beneficiary, the member's individual account must be distributed to the member's estate. Upon the death of a designated beneficiary who succeeded the member in death, the member's individual account must be distributed to the designated beneficiary's estate.

To the extent allowed under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, the board may, but is not required to, provide by rule for loans or disaster distributions to members and for in-service distributions.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 297, § 1, effective August 10.